Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
COMPOSITION AND SELECTION OF THE JURY

Law reviews:

For article, "Judicial Restrictions on Voir Dire: Have We Gone Too Far?", see 97 Denv. L. Rev. 327 (2020).

16-10-101. Jury trials - statement of policy.

The right of a person who is accused of an offense other than a noncriminal traffic infraction or offense, civil infraction, or offense other than a municipal charter, municipal ordinance, or county ordinance violation as provided in section 16-10-109 (1), to have a trial by jury is inviolate and a matter of substantive due process of law as distinguished from one of "practice and procedure". The people also have the right to refuse to consent to a waiver of a trial or sentencing determination by jury in all cases in which the accused has the right to request a trial or sentencing determination by jury.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 235, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-101.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 655, § 5, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 667, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 828, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 859, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

Entire section amended, p. 16, § 11, effective July 12.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 342, § 14, effective March 1.

16-10-102. When jury panel exhausted.

In all criminal cases where the panel of jurors is exhausted by challenge or otherwise, and whether any juror has been selected and sworn or not, the court may order the issuance of a venire for any number of jurors not exceeding twenty-four, returnable forthwith, out of which persons so ordered to be summoned it is lawful to impanel a jury for the trial of any criminal case. Should the jurors thus summoned be insufficient, by reason of challenges or otherwise, to form an impartial jury, the court may make further orders for additional jurors, returnable forthwith, until a full jury is obtained.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 235, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-102.

16-10-103. Challenge of jurors for cause.

The court shall sustain a challenge for cause on one or more of the following grounds:

Absence of any qualification prescribed by statute to render a person competent as a juror;

Relationship within the third degree, by blood, adoption, or marriage, to a defendant or to any attorney of record or attorney engaged in the trial of the case;

Standing in the relation of guardian and ward, employer and employee, landlord and tenant, debtor and creditor, or principal and agent to, or being a member of the household of, or a partner in business with, or surety on any bond or obligation for any defendant;

The juror is or has been a party adverse to the defendant in a civil action or has complained against or been accused by him in a criminal prosecution;

The juror has served on the grand jury which returned the indictment, or on a coroner's jury which inquired into the death of a person whose death is the subject of the indictment or information, or on any other investigatory body which inquired into the facts of the crime charged;

The juror was a juror at a former trial arising out of the same factual situation or involving the same defendant;

The juror was a juror in a civil action against the defendant arising out of the act charged as a crime;

The juror was a witness to any matter related to the crime or its prosecution;

The juror occupies a fiduciary relationship to the defendant or a person alleged to have been injured by the crime or the person on whose complaint the prosecution was instituted;

The existence of a state of mind in the juror evincing enmity or bias toward the defendant or the state; however, no person summoned as a juror shall be disqualified by reason of a previously formed or expressed opinion with reference to the guilt or innocence of the accused, if the court is satisfied, from the examination of the juror or from other evidence, that he will render an impartial verdict according to the law and the evidence submitted to the jury at the trial;

The juror is a compensated employee of a public law enforcement agency or a public defender's office.

If any juror knows of anything which would disqualify him as a juror or be a ground for challenge to him for cause, it is his duty to inform the court concerning it whether or not he is specifically asked about it. The jury panel shall be advised of this duty and of the grounds for challenge for cause before any prospective jurors are called to the jury box.

If either party desires to introduce evidence of the incompetency, disqualification, or prejudice of any prospective juror who upon the voir dire examination appears to be qualified, competent, and unprejudiced, such evidence shall be heard, and the competency of the juror shall be determined, by the court, out of the presence of the other jurors, but this action cannot be taken after the jury has been sworn to try the case except upon a motion for mistrial.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 236, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-103.

L. 98:

(1)(k) amended, p. 466, § 6, effective January 1, 1999.

16-10-104. Peremptory challenges.

In capital cases, the state and the defendant, when there is one defendant, shall each be entitled to ten peremptory challenges. In all other cases, where there is one defendant and the punishment may be by imprisonment in the correctional facilities operated by the department of corrections, the state and the defendant shall each be entitled to five peremptory challenges, and in all other cases to three peremptory challenges. If there is more than one defendant, each side shall be entitled to an additional three peremptory challenges for every defendant after the first in capital cases, but not exceeding twenty peremptory challenges to each side; in all other cases, where the punishment may be by imprisonment in the correctional facilities operated by the department of corrections, to two additional peremptory challenges for every defendant after the first, not exceeding fifteen peremptory challenges to each side; and in all other cases, to one additional peremptory challenge for every defendant after the first, not exceeding ten peremptory challenges to each side. In any case where there are multiple defendants, every peremptory challenge shall be made and considered as the joint peremptory challenge of all defendants. In case of the consolidation of any indictments, informations, complaints, or summonses and complaints for trial, such consolidated cases shall be considered, for all purposes concerning peremptory challenges, as though the defendants had been joined in the same indictment, information, complaint, or summons and complaint. When trial is held on a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity, the number of peremptory challenges shall be the same as if trial were on the issue of substantive guilt.

Peremptory challenges shall be exercised as provided by applicable rule of criminal procedure.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 237, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-104.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 678, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 890, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 617, § 9, effective July 1.

16-10-105. Alternate jurors.

The court may direct that a sufficient number of jurors in addition to the regular jury be called and impaneled to sit as alternate jurors. Alternate jurors in the order in which they are called shall replace jurors who, prior to the time the jury retires to consider its verdict, become unable or disqualified to perform their duties. Alternate jurors shall be drawn in the same manner, shall have the same qualifications, shall be subject to the same examination and challenges, shall take the same oath, and shall have the same functions, powers, facilities, and privileges as the regular jurors. An alternate juror shall be discharged when the jury retires to consider its verdict or at such time as determined by the court. When alternate jurors are impaneled, each side is entitled to one peremptory challenge in addition to those otherwise allowed by law. In a case in which a class 1, 2, or 3 felony, as described in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(IV) and (1)(a)(V), C.R.S., is charged, and in a case in which a level 1 or level 2 drug felony as described in section 18-1.3-401.5, C.R.S., is charged, and in any case in which a felony listed in section 24-4.1-302 (1), C.R.S., is charged, the court shall impanel at least one juror to sit as an alternate if requested by any party.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 237, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-105.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 924, § 5, effective March 27.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 429, § 6, effective May 24.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1394, § 7, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1930, § 44, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-163), ch. 391, p. 1969, § 3, effective June 6.

16-10-106. Incapacity of juror.

Where a jury of twelve has been sworn to try the case, and any juror by reason of illness or other cause becomes unable to continue until a verdict is reached, the court may excuse such juror. If no alternate juror is available to replace the juror, the parties at any time before verdict may stipulate in writing with court approval that the jury shall consist of any number less than twelve, and the jurors thus remaining shall proceed to try the case and determine the issues unless discharged by the court for inability to reach a verdict.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 237, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-106.

16-10-107. Challenge to entire jury panel.

A challenge to the panel is an objection to the entire panel of prospective trial jurors made by the defendant or by the prosecuting attorney. No challenge to the panel shall be made, except as provided by section 13-71-139, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 238, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-107.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 776, § 8, effective January 1, 1990.

16-10-108. Verdict.

The verdict of the jury shall be unanimous. The jury shall return its verdict in open court, but a sealed verdict may be received as provided by rule of the supreme court of Colorado.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 238, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-108.

16-10-109. Trial by jury for petty offenses.

For the purposes of this section, "petty offense" means any crime or offense classified as a petty offense or, if not so classified, which is punishable by imprisonment other than in a correctional facility for not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine, and includes any violation of a municipal ordinance or offense which was not considered a crime at common law; except that violation of a municipal traffic ordinance which does not constitute a criminal offense or any other municipal charter, municipal ordinance, or county ordinance offense which is neither criminal nor punishable by imprisonment under any counterpart state statute shall not constitute a petty offense. No child under the age of eighteen years shall be entitled to a trial by jury for a violation of a municipal ordinance or a county ordinance for which imprisonment in jail is not a possible penalty. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall prohibit a municipality or county from granting a right to trial by jury for ordinance violations.

A defendant charged with a petty offense shall be entitled to a jury trial if, within twenty-one days after entry of a plea, the defendant makes a request to the court for a jury trial, in writing, and tenders to the court a jury fee of twenty-five dollars unless the fee is waived by the judge because of the indigence of the defendant. The jury shall consist of three jurors unless a greater number, not to exceed six, is requested by the defendant in said jury demand. If the charge is dismissed or the defendant is acquitted of the charge or if the defendant, having paid the jury fee, files with the court at least seven days before the scheduled trial date a written waiver of jury trial, the jury fee shall be refunded.

At the time of arraignment for any petty offense in this state, the judge shall advise any defendant not represented by counsel of the defendant's right to trial by jury, of the requirement that the defendant, if he or she desires to invoke his or her right to trial by jury, request such trial by jury within twenty-one days after entry of a plea, in writing, of the number of jurors allowed by law, and of the requirement that the defendant, if he or she desires to invoke his or her right to trial by jury, tender to the court within twenty-one days after entry of a plea a jury fee of twenty-five dollars unless the fee is waived by the judge because of the indigence of the defendant.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 238, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-109.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 679, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 655, § 6, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 667, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1728, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1680, § 3, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 859, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 427, § 9, effective July 28.

L. 2012:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 853, § 82, effective July 1.

16-10-110. Jury instructions - cases involving the possibility of the death penalty.

At the trial of any felony in which the prosecution is not seeking the death penalty, upon the request of the prosecution or the defendant, the court shall instruct the jury during voir dire that the prosecution is not seeking the death penalty.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 828, § 36, effective July 1.